Illinois, session 104th, HB4213.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5A-7 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5A-7)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5A-7)7    Sec. 5A-7. Administration; enforcement provisions. 8    (a) The Illinois Department shall establish and maintain a 9listing of all hospital providers appearing in the licensing 10records of the Illinois Department of Public Health, which 11shall show each provider's name and principal place of 12business and the name and address of each hospital operated, 13conducted, or maintained by the provider in this State. The 14listing shall also include the monthly assessment amounts owed 15for each hospital and any unpaid assessment liability greater 16than 90 days delinquent. The Illinois Department shall 17administer and enforce this Article and collect the 18assessments and penalty assessments imposed under this Article 19using procedures employed in its administration of this Code 20generally. The Illinois Department, its Director, and every 21hospital provider subject to assessment under this Article 22shall have the following powers, duties, and rights:23        (1) The Illinois Department may initiate either   HB4213- 2 -LRB104 16334 KTG 29721 b1    administrative or judicial proceedings, or both, to 2    enforce provisions of this Article. Administrative 3    enforcement proceedings initiated hereunder shall be 4    governed by the Illinois Department's administrative 5    rules. Judicial enforcement proceedings initiated 6    hereunder shall be governed by the rules of procedure 7    applicable in the courts of this State.8        (2) (Blank).9        (3) Any unpaid assessment under this Article shall 10    become a lien upon the assets of the hospital upon which it 11    was assessed. If any hospital provider, outside the usual 12    course of its business, sells or transfers the major part 13    of any one or more of (A) the real property and 14    improvements, (B) the machinery and equipment, or (C) the 15    furniture or fixtures, of any hospital that is subject to 16    the provisions of this Article, the seller or transferor 17    shall pay the Illinois Department the amount of any 18    assessment, assessment penalty, and interest (if any) due 19    from it under this Article up to the date of the sale or 20    transfer. The Illinois Department may, in its discretion, 21    foreclose on such a lien, but shall do so in a manner that 22    is consistent with Section 5e of the Retailers' Occupation 23    Tax Act. If the seller or transferor fails to pay any 24    assessment, assessment penalty, and interest (if any) due, 25    the purchaser or transferee of such asset shall be liable 26    for the amount of the assessment, penalties, and interest   HB4213- 3 -LRB104 16334 KTG 29721 b1    (if any) up to the amount of the reasonable value of the 2    property acquired by the purchaser or transferee. The 3    purchaser or transferee shall continue to be liable until 4    the purchaser or transferee pays the full amount of the 5    assessment, penalties, and interest (if any) up to the 6    amount of the reasonable value of the property acquired by 7    the purchaser or transferee or until the purchaser or 8    transferee receives from the Illinois Department a 9    certificate showing that such assessment, penalty, and 10    interest have been paid or a certificate from the Illinois 11    Department showing that no assessment, penalty, or 12    interest is due from the seller or transferor under this 13    Article.14        (4) Payments under this Article are not subject to the 15    Illinois Prompt Payment Act. Credits or refunds shall not 16    bear interest.17    (b) In addition to any other remedy provided for and 18without sending a notice of assessment liability, the Illinois 19Department shall collect an unpaid assessment by withholding, 20as payment of the assessment, reimbursements or other amounts 21otherwise payable by the Illinois Department to the hospital 22provider, including, but not limited to, payment amounts 23otherwise payable from a managed care organization performing 24duties under contract with the Illinois Department. 25        (1) The requirements of this subsection may be waived 26    in instances when a disaster proclamation has been   HB4213- 4 -LRB104 16334 KTG 29721 b1    declared by the Governor. In such circumstances, a 2    hospital must demonstrate temporary financial distress and 3    establish an agreement with the Illinois Department 4    specifying when repayment in full of all taxes owed will 5    occur.6        (2) The requirements of this subsection may be waived 7    by the Illinois Department in instances when a hospital 8    has entered into and remains in compliance with a 9    repayment plan or a tax deferral plan. A repayment plan or 10    tax deferral plan must be entered into no later than 30 11    days after notice of an unpaid assessment payment. No 12    repayment plan may exceed a period of 72 36 months. No tax 13    deferral plan may exceed a period of 6 months, and 14    repayment after the end of a tax deferral plan shall not 15    exceed 72 36 months. Failure to remain in compliance with 16    a repayment plan or tax deferral plan shall cause 17    immediate termination of such plan unless there is prior 18    written consent from the Illinois Department for a period 19    of non-compliance.20        (3) Beginning September 1, 2025, the Illinois 21    Department shall immediately collect all overdue unpaid 22    assessments and penalties through the collection methods 23    authorized under this Section, unless a repayment plan or 24    tax deferral plan has already been agreed to by September 25    1, 2025. 26        (4) For any unpaid assessments and penalties that are   HB4213- 5 -LRB104 16334 KTG 29721 b1    overdue as of the effective date of House Bill 2771 of the 2    104th General Assembly, upon receipt of payment the 3    Department may, at its discretion, transfer funds from the 4    Hospital Provider Fund to the Healthcare Provider Relief 5    Fund, provided that, at the time of each transfer, there 6    are no outstanding assessment-related payments owed to 7    hospitals that cannot be paid from resources remaining in 8    the Hospital Provider Fund after the transfer. 9    (c) To provide for the expeditious and timely 10implementation of the changes made to this Section by this 11amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 12may adopt emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 13Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The adoption of 14emergency rules is deemed to be necessary for the public 15interest, safety, and welfare. 16(Source: P.A. 104-2, eff. 6-16-25; 104-7, eff. 6-16-25.)